Connecticut, session 2026, SB00380.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section,
"promise program" means a scholarship program that provides a
scholarship in conjunction with services and resources, including, but
not limited to, mentoring, peer support networks and internships, to
scholarship recipients to ensure the postsecondary academic success of
such recipients.
(b) (1) Not later than September 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the
Office of Higher Education shall provide a grant to each promise
program in the state that was established during or prior to the previous
fiscal year. Such grant shall be in an amount equal to three thousand
dollars per student enrolled in such promise program.
(2) Not later than July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, each promise
program that receives a grant pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall report to the Office of Higher Education the rate of
graduation, postsecondary program enrollment and job placement
achieved by the students enrolled in such promise program during the
fiscal year in which such grant was received.
LCO 1 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 380
(c) The Office of Higher Education shall establish a program to
support the establishment of new promise programs throughout the
state, with a goal of establishing eight new promise programs not later
than January 1, 2031, prioritizing the establishment of promise
programs that serve students in alliance districts, as defined in section
10-262u of the general statutes. The office shall coordinate with
municipalities and regional coalitions interested in establishing new
promise programs. The office shall support each new promise program
through the provision of (1) funding, in an amount designated by the
commissioner of said office, for the start-up expenses of such promise
program, and (2) technical assistance to start such promise program,
including, but not limited to, (A) initial funding strategies, (B)
stakeholder engagement, including, but not limited to, with each local
or regional board of education, legislative body and local nonprofit
organization and business of the municipality or region in which such
new promise program is located, (C) program design based on the local
environment, (D) development of evaluation metrics, and (E)
sustainability planning. The office shall hire a consultant with expertise
in the development and operation of promise programs to implement
the provisions of this subsection.
(d) Not later than January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter until
January 1, 2031, or until the establishment of eight new promise
programs, whichever is earlier, the Office of Higher Education shall
submit, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general
statutes, to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to higher education and
employment advancement a progress report from the consultant hired
pursuant to subsection (c) of this section on the establishment of new
promise programs in the state.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Net cost of attendance" means the rate of tuition and required
fees that are established by an institution of higher education for the
academic year commencing with the fall semester of 2026, minus an
LCO 2 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 380
average amount of financial aid received by a student in such student's
income bracket;
(2) "Financial aid" means the sum of all scholarships, grants and
federal, state and institutional aid received each academic year by a
qualifying student. "Financial aid" does not include any federal, state or
private student loans received by a qualifying student;
(3) "Qualifying student" means any person who (A) is a resident of
the state, (B) attended from grades nine to twelve, inclusive, and
graduated from a public or nonpublic high school in the state, with a
cumulative attendance rate of not less than ninety per cent, (C) enrolls,
not more than one year after graduating from such high school, as a full-
time student for the academic year commencing with the fall semester
of 2026, or any academic year thereafter, at an institution of higher
education in a program leading to a bachelor's degree, (D) is making
satisfactory academic progress while enrolled at such institution, (E)
maintains good academic standing, as determined by such institution,
while enrolled at such institution, (F) has completed the Free
Application for Federal Student Aid, and (G) has accepted all available
financial aid;
(4) "Institution of higher education" means each (A) constituent unit,
as defined in section 10a-1 of the general statutes, of the state system of
higher education, and (B) nonprofit institution established in the state
(i) that has degree-granting authority in the state; (ii) that has its main
campus located in the state; (iii) that is not included in the state system
of public higher education; and (iv) whose primary function is not the
preparation of students for religious vocation;
(5) "Full-time student" means a student who is enrolled at an
institution of higher education and is carrying twelve or more credit
hours in a semester; and
(6) "First-year experience program" means a program of support to
assist a student in the student's transition from high school to higher
education through the provision of specialized academic support, peer
LCO 3 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 380
mentorship, orientation and connection to campus resources
throughout the student's first academic year at an institution of higher
education.
(b) The Office of Higher Education shall establish a grant program
known as the Scholar Success Grant Program. For the academic year
commencing with the fall semester of 2026, and each academic year
thereafter, the office shall award a Scholar Success Grant to each
qualifying student at the following percentage of the net cost of
attendance at (1) a public institution of higher education in the state: (A)
Forty per cent for a qualifying student with a household income of thirty
thousand dollars or less, (B) thirty-six per cent for a qualifying student
with a household income greater than thirty thousand dollars, but not
more than forty-eight thousand dollars, (C) thirty-two per cent for a
qualifying student with a household income greater than forty-eight
thousand dollars, but not more than seventy-five thousand dollars, (D)
twenty-eight per cent for a qualifying student with a household income
greater than seventy-five thousand dollars, but not more than one
100 hundred ten thousand dollars, and (E) twenty-four per cent for a
101 qualifying student with a household income greater than one hundred
102 ten thousand dollars, or (2) an independent institution of higher
103 education, as defined in section 10a-173 of the general statutes: (A)
104 Twenty per cent for a qualifying student with a household income of
105 thirty thousand dollars or less, (B) sixteen per cent for a qualifying
106 student with a household income greater than thirty thousand dollars,
107 but not more than forty-eight thousand dollars, (C) twelve per cent for
108 a qualifying student with a household income greater than forty-eight
109 thousand dollars, but not more than seventy-five thousand dollars, (D)
110 eight per cent for a qualifying student with a household income greater
111 than seventy-five thousand dollars, but not more than one hundred ten
112 thousand dollars, and (E) eight per cent for a qualifying student with a
113 household income greater than one hundred ten thousand dollars. Such
114 grant shall be available to such qualifying student for not more than six
115 consecutive academic years or until such qualifying student graduates,
116 whichever occurs sooner. The office shall provide each Scholar Success
LCO 4 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 380
117 Grant directly to the institution of higher education in which such
118 student enrolls, provided such institution complies with the
119 requirements set forth in subsection (c) of this section.
120 (c) To receive a Scholar Success Grant from the Office of Higher
121 Education for any qualifying student who enrolls at an institution of
122 higher education, such institution shall: (1) Enroll each qualifying
123 student in a first-year experience program at such institution, (2) enroll
124 each qualifying student in a financial literacy program during the spring
125 or summer prior to such qualifying student's first academic year at such
126 institution, (3) provide to each qualifying student a transparent
127 multiyear financial aid award letter in an easily understood format that
128 includes, but is not limited to, the net cost of attendance, designation of
129 any one-time awards or costs and an explanation of student loan
130 expectations, and (4) assign to each qualifying student an advisor who
131 shall advise such qualifying student when making financial, academic
132 or career decisions from the time such qualifying student accepts
133 admission to such institution until such qualifying student graduates.
134 (d) Not later than January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the Office
135 of Higher Education shall submit a report, in accordance with the
136 provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing
137 committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
138 relating to higher education and employment advancement. Such report
139 shall include, but need not be limited to, the (1) number of qualifying
140 students receiving Scholar Success Grants during the current academic
141 year, (2) household income brackets of such students, and (3) amount of
142 such grants received by each institution of higher education for the
143 academic year during which the office submits such report.
144 Sec. 3. (Effective July 1, 2026) The sum of four million eight hundred
145 thousand dollars is appropriated to the Office of Higher Education,
146 from the General Fund, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for
147 grants to promise programs pursuant to section 1 of this act.
148 Sec. 4. (Effective July 1, 2026) The sum of thirty million dollars is
LCO 5 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 380
149 appropriated to the Office of Higher Education, from the General Fund,
150 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for the Scholar Success Grant
151 Program established pursuant to section 2 of this act.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 4 July 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(c)(1), "executive director" was changed to "commissioner"
for accuracy; in Section 1(c)(2)(B), "with" was inserted before "each local"
and "of the municipality or region in which such new promise program
is located" was inserted after "business" for clarity; and in Section 2(d),
"2026" was changed to "2027" for accuracy.
HED Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 6 of 6